Hawaii statutes.
§76-13 Specific duties and powers of
director. The director shall direct and supervise all the administrative
and technical activities of the director's department. In addition to other
duties imposed upon the director by this chapter, the director shall:

(1) Establish and maintain a roster of all persons in
the civil service;

(2) Appoint employees necessary to assist the
director in the proper performance of the director's duties and for which
appropriations shall have been made;

(3) Foster and develop, in cooperation with
appointing authorities and others, programs for the improvement of employee
efficiency;

(4) Cooperate fully with appointing authorities,
giving full recognition to their requirements and needs, in the administration
of this chapter to promote public service by establishing conditions of service
that will attract and retain employees of character and capability, and to
increase efficiency and productivity in governmental departments by
continuously improving methods of human resources administration and maximizing
the use of advanced technology;

(5) Encourage and exercise leadership in the
development of effective human resources administration within the several
departments and make available the facilities of the director's department to
this end;

(6) Investigate from time to time the operation and
effect of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder;

(7) Develop and maintain classification systems;

(8) Make recommendations and advise the chief
executive on appropriate adjustments for employees excluded from collective
bargaining as authorized under chapter 89C; and

(9) Perform any other lawful acts deemed by the
director to be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions
of this chapter. [L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL 1955, pt of §3-19; am L 1957, c
157, §1 and c 206, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §11; am L 1964, c 28, §2; HRS
§76-13; am L 1976, c 35, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 102, §2; am L 1994, c
56, §8; am L 2000, c 253, §11]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Attorney General Opinions

Only the director of personnel services and the
administrative director of the courts are empowered to act on reallocation
requests. Att. Gen. Op. 81-10.

Effective date of reallocation determines whether retroactive
pay adjustment made. Att. Gen. Op. 85-4.

Case Notes

Re refusal to certify felon as adult corrections officer.
402 F. Supp. 84.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next